Hawaii statutes.
§386-51.5 Limited liability in concurrent
employment. Where an employee is concurrently engaged in more than one
employment covered by this chapter and sustains a personal injury in one
employment under conditions specified in section 386-3, the liability of the
employer shall be limited to the benefits as would be payable had the employee
no other employment than the one in which the employee was injured. The
balance of the employee's benefits shall be paid from the special compensation
fund, except that benefits for disability rated as a percentage of total
impairment of physical or mental function of the whole person shall be the sole
liability of the employer. [L 1970, c 53, §2; gen ch 1985, 1993; am L 1998, c
281, §1]

Case Notes

Section does not address the circumstance of multiple
concurrent employers being simultaneously liable for the employee's benefits;
in such circumstances, the director may apportion liability among the liable
employers; the apportionment of liability may be in proportion to the wages
earned by the employee in the employ of each of those employers. 94 H. 70, 9
P.3d 382 (2000).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next